Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1432
Funeral director; employ assistant funeral director; requirements.

A funeral director who is employing an assistant funeral director shall enter into a collaborative agreement with the assistant funeral director, supervise the assistant funeral director, and keep records of the collaborative agreement and the functions of the assistant funeral director.

Laws 2025, LB332, § 9.